Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2545.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Insurance Coverage for Vaginal Estrogen Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost sharing." The following:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee or covered person pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge.(3) The term does not include a premium, a balance 12345678910111213141516171819 billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(7) A fixed indemnity policy.(8) A hospital indemnity policy.(9) A dental only policy.(10) A vision only policy.(11) A workers' compensation policy.(12) An automobile medical payment policy under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(13) A homeowner's insurance policy.(14) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Menopausal symptoms." Any of the following:(1) Irregular menstrual periods.(2) Hot flashes.(3) Vaginal or bladder problems.(4) Decrease in fertility.20260HB2545PN3452 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Loss of bone density, including osteoporosis.(6) Elevated low-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels.(7) Sleep disruption, including night sweats."Menopause." The cessation of menstrual periods for 12 consecutive months, which can occur by a natural process of the body or can be caused medically or surgically, and may be accompanied by menopausal symptoms."Urinary tract infection." An infection that occurs in any part of the urinary system."Vaginal estrogen." The hormone estrogen in a form that is applied to or inserted into the vagina, vulva, opening of the urethra or the cervix.Section 3. Coverage requirement.A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth after the effective date of this section shall provide coverage for vaginal estrogen for the treatment of menopausal symptoms and for the prevention of urinary tract infections. The coverage required under this section shall, at a minimum, include coverage for all drugs, devices and combination products approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the provision or administration of vaginal estrogen. The coverage required under this section shall be subject to the terms and conditions of a health insurance policy, including provisions relating to medical necessity, cost sharing and utilization review.Section 4. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the department, this act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first 20260HB2545PN3452 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the department, this act shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days from the effective date of this paragraph.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2545PN3452 - 4 - 1234567